Maryland, session 2025, HB0921.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Personnel and Pensions
9–1101.
Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle, this subtitle applies to all employees
in the State Personnel Management System, except temporary employees.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0921*

HOUSE BILL 921
9–1110.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO ALL EMPLOYEES, INCLUDING TEMPORARY
EMPLOYEES, IN THE EXECUTIVE, JUDICIAL, AND LEGISLATIVE BRANCHES OF
STATE GOVERNMENT, INCLUDING ANY UNIT WITH AN INDEPENDENT PERSONNEL
SYSTEM.
(B) AN EMPLOYEE SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION IS ENTITLED TO COLLEAGUE
BEREAVEMENT LEAVE WITH PAY.
(C) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, AN EMPLOYEE
MAY USE UP TO 5 DAYS OF COLLEAGUE BEREAVEMENT LEAVE IMMEDIATELY
FOLLOWING THE DEATH OF A COLLEAGUE WHO IS EMPLOYED BY THE SAME AGENCY
AS THE EMPLOYEE IF:
(I) THE COLLEAGUE’S DEATH OCCURS ON THE JOB; AND
(II) THE EMPLOYEE WORKS IN CLOSE PROXIMITY TO THE
COLLEAGUE WHO DIED.
(2) AN EMPLOYEE MAY USE COLLEAGUE BEREAVEMENT LEAVE ONLY
AFTER NOTIFYING THE EMPLOYEE’S APPOINTING AUTHORITY OF THE EMPLOYEE’S
INTENTION TO USE COLLEAGUE BEREAVEMENT LEAVE.
(3) AN EMPLOYEE’S APPOINTING AUTHORITY MAY NOT REQUIRE AN
EMPLOYEE ENTITLED TO USE COLLEAGUE BEREAVEMENT LEAVE UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION TO USE ANY OTHER PAID LEAVE AVAILABLE
TO THE EMPLOYEE.
(D) THE SECRETARY SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS GOVERNING COLLEAGUE
BEREAVEMENT LEAVE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.